Hawaii statutes.
§414D-304
Court-ordered inspection. (a) If a corporation does not allow a member
who complies with section 414D‑302(a) to inspect and copy any records
required by that section to be available for inspection, the court in the
county where the corporation's principal office (or, if none in this State, in
the city and county of Honolulu) is located may summarily order inspection and
copying of the records demanded at the corporation's expense upon application
of the member.

(b) If a corporation does not within a
reasonable time allow a member to inspect and copy any other record, the member
who complies with section 414D‑302(b) and (c) may apply to the court in
the county where the corporation's principal office (or, if none in this State,
in the city and county of Honolulu) is located for an order to permit
inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an
application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

(c) If the court orders inspection and copying
of the records demanded, it shall also order the corporation to pay the
member's costs (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred to obtain the order
unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection in good faith because
it had a reasonable basis to doubt the right of the member to inspect the
records demanded.

(d) If the court orders inspection and copying
of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or
distribution of the records by the demanding member.
[L 2001, c 105, pt of §1; am L 2009, c 55, §28]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next